Washington statutes.
RCW 22.28.010

Definitions.

The term safe deposit company as used in RCW 22.28.010 through 22.28.060 shall be construed to extend to and include all banks, trust companies and other corporations organized under the laws of the state of Washington or of the United States of America, and doing business in the state of Washington; which are empowered by law to let vaults, safes or other receptacles upon the premises occupied by such bank, trust company or corporation.

[ 1923 c 186 s 1; RRS s 3382.]